Montana, session 2025, SB16.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 5-5-109, MCA, is amended to read:
"5-5-109. Contempt -- misdemeanor. (1) If a witness neglects or refuses to obey a subpoena or,
appearing, neglects or refuses to testify, the a legislative committee of either the senate or the house, or a joint
legislative committee, may, by resolution entered on the journal majority vote, commit the witness for contempt.
(2) If a person compelled to produce records under 5-5-107(3) neglects or refuses to obey a
subpoena, the a legislative committee of either the senate or the house, or a joint legislative committee, may,
by resolution entered on the journal, majority vote, commit the witness for contempt.
(3) A person who neglects or refuses to obey a subpoena under subsection (1) or (2) is guilty of a
misdemeanor punishable as provided in 46-18-212."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 16